North Carolina statutes. Chapter 115D. Community Colleges.
Article 1. General Provisions for State Administration.
§ 115D-5.1.
Workforce Development Programs.

Community colleges shall assist in the preemployment and in-service training of employees in industry, business, agriculture, health occupation and governmental agencies. Such training shall include instruction on worker safety and health standards and practices applicable to the field of employment. The State Board of Community Colleges shall make appropriate regulations including the establishment of maximum hours of instruction which may be offered at State expense in each in-plant training program. No instructor or other employee of a community college shall engage in the normal management, supervisory and operational functions of the establishment in which the instruction is offered during the hours in which the instructor or other employee is employed for instructional or educational purposes.

through (d) Repealed by Session Laws 2008-107, s. 8.7(a), effective July 1, 2008.

(e)

There is created within the North Carolina Community College System the Customized Training Program. The Customized Training Program shall offer programs and training services to assist new and existing business and industry to remain productive, profitable, and within the State. Before a business or industry qualifies to receive assistance under the Customized Training Program, the President of the North Carolina Community College System shall determine that:

The business is making an appreciable capital investment;

The business is deploying new technology;

(2a)

The business or individual is creating jobs, expanding an existing workforce, or enhancing the productivity and profitability of the operations within the State; and

The skills of the workers will be enhanced by the assistance.

(f)

The Community Colleges System Office shall report no later than September 1 of each year to the Joint Legislative Education Oversight Committee on:

(1)

The total amount of funds received by a company under the Customized Training Program.

(1a)

The types of services sought by the company, whether for new, expanding, or existing industry.

(2)

The amount of funds per trainee received by that company.

(3)

The amount of funds received per trainee by the community college delivering the training.

The number of trainees trained by the company and community college.

The number of years that company has been funded.

(f1)

Notwithstanding any other provision of law, the State Board of Community Colleges may adopt guidelines that allow the Customized Training Program to use funds appropriated for that program to support training projects for the various branches of the Armed Forces of the United States.

(f2)

Funds available to the Customized Training Program shall not revert at the end of a fiscal year but shall remain available until expended. Up to ten percent (10%) of the college-delivered training expenditures and up to five percent (5%) of the contractor-delivered training expenditures for the prior fiscal year for Customized Training may be allotted to each college for capacity building at that college.

(f3)

Of the funds appropriated in a fiscal year for the Customized Training Programs, the State Board of Community Colleges may approve the use of up to eight percent (8%) for the training and support of regional community college personnel to deliver Customized Training Program services to business and industry.

(g)

The State Board shall adopt guidelines to implement this section. At least 20 days before the effective date of any criteria or nontechnical amendments to guidelines, the State Board must publish the proposed guidelines on the Community Colleges System Office’s web site and provide notice to persons who have requested notice of proposed guidelines. In addition, the State Board must accept oral and written comments on the proposed guidelines during the 15 business days beginning on the first day that the State Board has completed these notifications. For the purpose of this subsection, a technical amendment is either of the following:

(1)

An amendment that corrects a spelling or grammatical error.

(2)

An amendment that makes a clarification based on public comment and could have been anticipated by the public notice that immediately preceded the public comment.

History.

2005-276, s. 8.4(a), (b); 2005-445, s. 3; 2008-107, s. 8.7(a); 2009-451, s. 8.14(c); 2009-523, s. 2(b); 2009-570, s. 41; 2010-96, s. 14; 2011-183, s. 79; 2019-165, s. 2.3.

Cross References.

As to “No Adult Left Behind” Initiative, see G.S. 143B-438.14.

§ 115D-5.2.
Commercial fishing and aquaculture classes.

The General Assembly urges all community colleges serving the coastal area of the State to offer classes on commercial fishing and aquaculture.

The North Carolina Community Colleges System Office shall provide technical assistance to these colleges on offering such classes.

The North Carolina Community Colleges System Office shall report to the Joint Legislative Education Oversight Committee on any fiscal and administrative issues it identifies that limit colleges’ ability to offer such courses.

History.

2015-63, ss. 1, 2(a), (b).

§ 115D-6.
Withdrawal of State support.

The State Board of Community Colleges may withdraw or withhold State financial and administrative support of any institutions subject to the provisions of this Chapter in the event that:

The required local financial support of an institution is not provided;

Sufficient State funds are not available;

The officials of an institution refuse or are unable to maintain prescribed standards of administration or instruction; or

Local educational needs for such an institution cease to exist.

History.

1963, c. 448, s. 23; 1979, c. 462, s. 2; c. 896, s. 8; 1979, 2nd Sess., c. 1130, s. 1.

§§ 115D-6.1 through 115D-6.4.

Reserved for future codification purposes.

§ 115D-6.5.
Notice of noncompliance; appointment of an interim board of trustees.

Notice. — The State Board of Community Colleges is responsible for assuring that boards of trustees of the community colleges comply with applicable State laws, rules, and sound fiscal and management practices, as defined in State Board policy. In addition to any actions taken by the State Board under G.S. 115D-6(3), if the State Board finds that a board of trustees of a community college has willfully, or as a result of gross negligence, failed to or refused to comply with applicable State laws, rules, and sound fiscal and management practices, the State Board may issue a written notice to the board of trustees of its findings and direct the board of trustees to take remedial action immediately to address those findings upon receipt of the notice. If the State Board finds the college needs assistance with taking remedial action, the State Board may also appoint an advisory committee to provide support and recommendations to the college. At a minimum, the advisory committee shall consist of representatives of the State Board of Community Colleges, the North Carolina Association of Community College Trustees, the North Carolina Association of Community College Presidents, and the System Office, and each party shall appoint its representative to the advisory committee.

Resolution. — If, after receipt of the notice issued under subsection (a) of this section, a board of trustees willfully, or as a result of gross negligence, persists in refusing or failing to comply with the State laws, rules, or sound fiscal and management practices identified in the notice, the State Board of Community Colleges may adopt a resolution, upon approval of at least two-thirds of the members of the State Board attending the meeting in which the resolution is considered, to vacate the terms of the leadership of the board of trustees to include, but not limited to, chair and vice-chair. The respective appointing authorities shall appoint trustees to fulfill the vacated terms and shall not appoint members whose terms were vacated pursuant to this section. If, after the removal of the leadership of the board of trustees, a board of trustees willfully, or as a result of gross negligence, persists in refusing or failing to comply with the State laws, rules, or sound fiscal and management practices identified in the notice, the State Board of Community Colleges may adopt a resolution, upon approval of at least two-thirds of the members of the State Board attending the meeting in which the resolution is considered to vacate the terms of the full board of trustees. Prior to adopting either resolution, the State Board shall consult with the appointing authorities of the board of trustees and representatives of the North Carolina Association of Community College Trustees and the North Carolina Association of Community College Presidents regarding the proposed resolution. The State Board shall only exercise this authority as an extraordinary remedy utilized in the most extreme circumstances and after all of the following remediation actions have been taken without correction of the identified problems:

The State Board has clearly delineated the failures to comply with applicable State laws, rules, or sound fiscal and management practices.

The advisory committee appointed consistent with subsection (a) of this section has met with the President of the college and the local board of trustees to discuss the problems in question and to assist the community college in question to resolve them.

The State Board has vacated the terms of the leadership of the board of trustees, but the identified problems continue to persist.

The State Board has issued a final warning providing the college with a deadline to resolve the identified problems.

Interim Board Assumption of Powers and Duties. — The adoption of the resolution to remove the full board under this section shall have the effect of vacating the terms of all of the members serving on the board of trustees. Notwithstanding

G.S. 115D-12

, the State Board of Community Colleges shall appoint an interim five-member board of trustees for a period not to exceed 12 months with input from the advisory committee listed in subsection (a) of this section. To preserve local autonomy, the appointing authorities of the local administrative area of the community college under

G.S. 115D-12

shall make recommendations to the State Board on the appointment of the members to the interim board of trustees. All appointees to the interim board of trustees shall be residents of the administrative area of the institution for which they are selected or of counties contiguous thereto with the exception of members provided for in subsection (a) of G.S. 115D-12, Group Four. At the end of the period of service of the interim board of trustees, a board of trustees for the community college shall be appointed in accordance with G.S. 115D-12. Initial terms of members of the new board of trustees shall be staggered to align with the remainder of the vacated terms of the members of the board of trustees.

Notice to the General Assembly. — Within 60 days of the adoption of the resolution to remove the full board under this section, the State Board shall report to the General Assembly in accordance with

G.S. 120-29.5

on the adoption of the resolution, the interim board of trustees appointed by the State Board, and any legislative recommendations necessary in regard to the future governance of the community college.

State Board Policy. — The State Board of Community Colleges shall adopt any policies necessary to implement the provisions of this section.

History.

2018-92, s. 1(a).

§ 115D-7.
Establishment of private, nonprofit corporations.

The State Board of Community Colleges shall encourage the establishment of private, nonprofit corporations to support the community college system. The President of the Community Colleges System with the approval of the State Board of Community Colleges, may assign employees to assist with the establishment and operation of such nonprofit corporation and may make available to the corporation office space, equipment, supplies and other related resources; provided, the sole purpose of the corporation is to support the community college system.

The board of directors of each private, nonprofit corporation shall secure and pay for the services of the State Auditor’s Office or employ a certified public accountant to conduct an audit of the financial accounts of the corporation. The board of directors shall transmit to the State Board of Community Colleges a copy of the annual financial audit report of the private nonprofit corporation.

History.

1987, c. 383, s. 1; 1999-84, s. 10.

§ 115D-8.
[Repealed]

Repealed by Session Laws 1999-84, s. 4, effective May 21, 1999.

§ 115D-9.
Powers of State Board regarding certain fee negotiations, contracts, and capital improvements.

The expenditures of any State funds for any capital improvements of existing institutions shall be subject to the prior approval of the State Board of Community Colleges and the Governor. The expenditure of State funds at any institution herein authorized to be approved by the State Board under

G.S. 115D-4

shall be subject to the terms of the State Budget Act unless specifically otherwise provided in this Chapter.

Notwithstanding

G.S. 143-341(3)

, the State Board of Community Colleges may, with respect to design, construction, repair, or renovation of buildings, utilities, and other State-funded property developments of the North Carolina Community College System requiring the estimated expenditure of public money of four million dollars ($4,000,000) or less:

Conduct the fee negotiations for all design contracts and supervise the letting of all construction and design contracts.

Develop procedures governing the responsibilities of the North Carolina Community College System and its community colleges to perform the duties of the Department of Administration and the Director or Office of State Construction under

G.S. 133-1.1(d)

and

G.S. 143-341(3)

.

Use existing plans and specifications for construction projects, where feasible. Prior to designing a project, the State Board shall consult with the Department of Administration on the availability of existing plans and specifications and the feasibility of using them for a project.

The State Board may delegate its authority under subsection (b) of this section to a community college if the community college is qualified under guidelines adopted by the State Board and approved by the State Building Commission and the Director of the Budget.

The North Carolina Community College System shall use the standard contracts for design and construction currently in use for State capital improvement projects by the Office of State Construction of the Department of Administration.

A contract may not be divided for the purpose of evading the monetary limit under this section.

Notwithstanding any other provision of this Chapter, the Department of Administration shall not be the awarding authority for contracts awarded under subsections (b) or (c) of this section.

The Community Colleges System Office shall report no later than October 1 of each year to the State Building Commission the following:

A list of projects governed by this section.

The estimated cost of each project along with the actual cost.

The name of each person awarded a contract under this section.

Whether the person or business awarded a contract under this section meets the definition of “minority business” or “minority person” as defined in G.S. 143-128.2(g).

The provisions of

G.S. 143-341(3)

shall not apply to a capital improvement project funded with non-State funds if the State Board of Community Colleges determines that the college has the expertise necessary to manage the project unless the assistance of the Office of State Construction is requested.

History.

2009-229, s. 2; 2011-145, s. 8.19(a); 2019-165, s. 2.4.

Local Modification.

Buncombe: 2013-112, s. 1, as amended by 2018-115, s. 1 (applicable only to construction projects and renovations funded entirely with county funds and coordinated by the County for College uses and purposes between January 1, 2012, and December 31, 2023); Henderson: 2016-22, s. 1 (applicable only to construction and renovation projects by the County at Blue Ridge Community College between January 1, 2015, and December 31, 2020); 2017-21, s. 1 (applicable only to construction and renovation projects by Henderson County on the campus of Blue Ridge Community College located within Henderson County between January 1, 2016, and December 31, 2021); 2019-66 (applicable only to construction and renovation projects by Henderson County on the Henderson County campus of Blue Ridge Community College between January 1, 2019, and December 31, 2023).

§§ 115D-10 through 115D-11.4.

Reserved for future codification purposes.